New York, session 2025-2026, A10629.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 2832 of the public health law, as 2 added by chapter 618 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3 5. Based on the findings and ongoing review of the workplace violence 4 assessment, general hospitals shall implement a workplace violence safe- 5 ty and security plan, which shall be updated as necessary to address 6 newly identified material risks and changes in conditions. The safety 7 and security plan shall specify methods to reduce identified risks, 8 which may include employee training, increased staffing and security, 9 engineering controls such as barriers, lighting, alarms and communi- 10 cation systems, safety equipment, general hospital improvements or 11 modifications, and other appropriate measures relevant to the general 12 hospital, and shall at a minimum include the use of metal detectors at 13 all public entrances. Each general hospital shall provide a written 14 detailed summary of the safety and security plan to its employees and 15 collective bargaining representatives, if applicable. Each general 16 hospital shall also provide information to its employees and collective 17 bargaining representatives, if applicable, about how to report incidents 18 of workplace violence. Each general hospital shall share summaries of 19 the incident log, appropriately redacted to protect the privacy of 20 persons involved in an incident, trends and analysis of relevant data 21 with the general hospital security or safety committee responsible for 22 workplace violence and ensure that the data is part of the workplace 23 violence assessment process. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, if 25 chapter 618 of the laws of 2025 shall not have taken effect on or before 26 such date then this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 27 same manner as such chapter of the laws of 2025 takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15207-01-6